Utah statutes.
73-4-21.   Duty to follow court proceedings -- Additional notice.
After the service of summons in the manner prescribed by Section 73-4-4
hereof, it shall be the duty of every person served to thereafter follow all
court proceedings and no further or additional notice shall be required except
the notice that the survey has been completed and the water users claim is due
as prescribed by Section 73-4-3, and notice of the proposed determinations as
provided by Section 73-4-11.  The district court may, however, require notice
of other proceedings to be given when, in the judgment of the court, it deems
notice necessary.
